Utah statutes.
32A-12-604 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Commercial bribery.
This section adopts and makes applicable to all industry members, including
beer industry members, doing business in this state 27 U.S.C. Section 205(c)
and 27 C.F.R. Sections 10.1 through 10.54 which make it unlawful for any
industry member, directly or indirectly or through an affiliate, to induce a
wholesaler or retailer engaged in the sale of alcoholic beverages to purchase
the industry member's products, to the complete or partial exclusion of
alcoholic beverages sold or offered for sale by other persons, by commercial
bribery, or by offering or giving a bonus, premium, compensation, or other
thing of value, to any officer, employee, or representative of the wholesaler
or retailer.
